California statutes. Financial Code
(a) “Mortgage loan originator” means an individual who, for compensation or gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain, takes a residential mortgage loan application or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.

(b) Mortgage loan originator does not include any of the following:

(1) An individual who performs purely administrative or clerical tasks on behalf of a person meeting the definition of a mortgage loan originator, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22014. The term “administrative or clerical tasks” means the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
 processing or underwriting of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a consumer to obtain information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan, to the extent that the communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

(2) An individual who solely renegotiates terms for existing mortgage loans held or serviced by his or her employer and who does not otherwise act as a mortgage loan originator, unless the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the SAFE Act requires such an employee to be licensed as a mortgage loan originator under state laws implementing the SAFE Act.

(3) An individual that is solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in Section 101(53D) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(4) An individual licensed as a mortgage loan originator pursuant to the provisions of Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10166.01) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code and the SAFE Act.

(5) An individual who is an employee of a federal, state, or local government agency or housing finance agency and who acts as a loan originator only pursuant to his or her official duties as an employee of the federal, state, or local government agency or housing finance agency.

(A) For purposes of this paragraph,
 the term “employee” means an individual whose manner and means of performance of work are subject to the right of control of, or are controlled by, a person, and whose compensation for federal income tax purposes is reported, or required to be reported, on a W-2 form issued by the controlling person.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “housing finance agency” means any authority:

(i) That is chartered by a state to help meet the affordable housing needs of the residents of the state.

(ii) That is supervised directly or indirectly by the state government.

(iii) That is subject to audit and review by the state in which it operates.

(6) (A) An employee of a bona fide nonprofit organization who exclusively originates residential mortgage loans for a bona fide nonprofit organization, and who acts as a mortgage loan originator only with respect to residential mortgage loans with terms that are favorable to the borrower.

(B) To qualify for the exemption under this paragraph, the bona fide nonprofit organization under this paragraph must register with the department on a form prescribed by the commissioner, along with documentation of all of the following by December 31 of each year:

(i) Status of a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(ii) That the organization promotes affordable housing or provides home ownership education or similar services.

(iii) That the organization conducts its activities in a manner that serves public or charitable purposes, rather than commercial purposes.

(iv) That the organization receives funding and revenue, and charges fees in a manner that does not incentivize the organization or its employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients.

(v) That the organization compensates employees in a manner that does not incentivize employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients.

(vi) That the organization provides to, or identifies for,
 the borrower residential mortgage loans with terms favorable to the borrower and comparable to mortgage loans and housing assistance provided under government housing assistance programs.

(vii) That the organization is certified by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as a housing counselor who engages solely in traditional housing counseling services, if applicable.

(C) The commissioner may periodically require reports regarding the activities of the bona fide nonprofit organization, and shall examine the nonprofit organization’s books and records in accordance with the regulations of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, or any successor guidance or requirement by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau. If the
 nonprofit organization fails to provide documentation as required by subparagraph (B), or if it does not continue to meet the criteria under subparagraph (B), the commissioner may revoke the nonprofit organization’s status as a registered bona fide nonprofit organization.

(D) For residential mortgage loans to have terms that are favorable to the borrower, the terms shall be consistent with loan origination in a public or charitable context, rather than a commercial context.

(E) In making its determinations and examinations, the commissioner may rely on the receipt and review of:

(i) Reports filed with federal, state, or local housing agencies and authorities.

(ii) Reports and attestations prescribed by the commissioner by rule or order.

(c) “Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who is all of the following:

(1) Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator.

(2) Is an employee of a depository institution, a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency, or an institution regulated by the
 Farm Credit Administration.

(3) Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(d) “Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of, and subject to the supervision and instruction of, a mortgage loan originator licensed by the state or a registered mortgage loan originator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 2.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22014.

(a) A loan processor or underwriter who does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator shall not be required to be licensed as a mortgage loan originator.

(b) An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

(c) An independent contractor may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter for a residential mortgage loan unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a mortgage loan originator license under this division. Each independent contractor loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage loan originator shall have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 11.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22015.

“PACE assessment” means a voluntary contractual assessment, voluntary special tax, or special tax, as described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 26054 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 12.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22016.

“PACE program” means a program in which financing is provided for the installation of efficiency improvements on real property and funded through the use of property assessments, as well as other program components defined in this section, established pursuant to any of the following:

(a) Chapter 29 (commencing with Section 5898.10) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) The Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(c) A charter city’s constitutional authority under Section 5 of
 Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 13.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22017.

(a) “PACE solicitor” means a person authorized by a program administrator to solicit a property owner to enter into an assessment contract.

(b) “PACE solicitor agent” means an individual who is employed or retained by, and acts on behalf of, a PACE solicitor to solicit a property owner to enter into an assessment contract.

(c) “PACE solicitor” and “PACE solicitor agent” do not include any of the following:

(1) A person employed by a program administrator.

(2) A person, including a home improvement contractor or subcontractor, who does not solicit property owners to enter
 into assessment contracts.

(3) A person who performs purely administrative or clerical tasks.

(4) A person who advertises a PACE program, if the content of the advertising is created, prepared, or approved by a program administrator, and advertising is subject to, and in compliance with this division.

(5) A person who obtains information regarding prospective applicants for PACE financing, or who provides to a program administrator information regarding prospective applicants for PACE financing, if that information was not obtained in connection with advertising or soliciting a PACE program.

(6) A person who only solicits a property owner to enter into an assessment contract with a person who is not considered a program administrator within the meaning
 of subdivision (b) of Section 22018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22018.

(a) “Program administrator” means a person administering a PACE program on behalf of, and with the written consent of, a public agency. “Program administrator” does not include a public agency.

(b) For purposes of this division, “program administrator” does not include a person who meets both of the following conditions:

(1) The person does not administer a PACE program that provides financing for the installation of efficiency improvements on residential property with four or fewer units.

(2) The person does not administer a PACE program that provides financing for the installation of efficiency improvements on real property with a
 market value of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 2.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22018.5.

“Property owner” means all property owners of record on the property subject to the PACE assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 16.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22019.

“Efficiency improvement” means one or more permanent improvements fixed to real property financed through a PACE assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 17.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22020.

“Public agency” means a city, including a charter city, county, city and county, municipal utility district, community services district, community facilities district, joint powers authority, sanitary district, sanitation district, or water district, as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code, that has established or participates in a PACE program, and utilizes a program administrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 18.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [22050. - 22068.]

22050.

(a) This division does not apply to any person doing business under any law of any state or of the United States relating to banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance premium finance agencies, credit unions, small business investment companies, community advantage lenders, California business and industrial development corporations when acting under federal law or other state authority, or licensed pawnbrokers when acting under the authority of that license.

“Community advantage lender” means an entity authorized by the United States Small Business Administration to deliver community advantage loans.

(b) This division does not apply to a check casher who
 holds a valid permit issued pursuant to Section 1789.37 of the Civil Code when acting under the authority of that permit, and shall not apply to a person holding a valid license issued pursuant to Section 23005 of the Financial Code when acting under the authority of that license.

(c) This division does not apply to a college or university making a loan for the purpose of permitting a person to pursue a program or course of study leading to a degree or certificate.

(d) This division does not apply to a broker-dealer acting pursuant to a certificate then in effect and issued pursuant to Section 25211 of the Corporations Code.

(e) This division does not apply to any person who makes five or fewer loans in a 12-month period, these loans are commercial loans as defined in Section 22502, and the loans are incidental to
 the business of the person relying upon the exemption.

(f) This division does not apply to any public corporation as defined in Section 67510 of the Government Code, any public entity other than the state as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code, or any agency of any one or more of the foregoing, when making any loan so long as the public corporation, public entity, or agency of any one or more of the foregoing complies with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (AB 1091)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22050.5.

This division does not apply to any person who makes no more than one loan in a 12-month period if that loan is a commercial loan as defined in Section 22502.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 16, Sec. 4.   (SB 577)   Effective April 28, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22051.

This division does not apply to the following:

(a) Any nonprofit cooperative association organized under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code that loans or advances money in connection with any activity mentioned in that chapter.

(b) Any corporation, association, syndicate, joint stock company, or partnership engaged exclusively in the business of marketing agricultural,
 horticultural, viticultural, dairy, livestock, poultry, or bee products on a cooperative nonprofit basis that loans or advances money to its members or in connection with those businesses.

(c) Any corporation securing money or credit from any federal intermediate credit bank organized and existing pursuant to the provisions of an act of Congress entitled “Agricultural Credits Act of 1923” that loans or advances money or credit so secured.

(d) Any corporation created pursuant to the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22052.

This division does not apply to any loan of credit made by a person not licensed under this division pursuant to a plan having all of the following characteristics:

(a) Credit cards issued pursuant to a written application and to the plan whereby the organization issuing the cards can acquire those obligations that its members in good standing incur with those persons with whom the organization has entered into written agreements setting forth the plan, and where the obligations are incurred
 pursuant to those agreements; or whereby the organization issuing the cards can extend credit to its members.

(b) The fee for the credit cards is designed to cover the administrative costs of the plan and is imposed upon the issuance of the card and on annual renewal dates thereafter.

(c) Any charges, discounts, or fees resulting from the acquisition of the charges is paid to the organization issuing the credit cards by the persons, corporations, or associations with whom the organization has entered into written agreements.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22053.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22054.

This division does not apply to bona fide conditional contracts of sale involving the disposition of personal property when these forms of sales agreements are not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22055.

This division does not apply to premium financing as defined in Section 18563.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22056.

This division does not apply to the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, any program authorized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or to the California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 10.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22057.

This division does not apply to any loan that is made or arranged by any person licensed as a real estate broker by the state and secured by a lien on real property, or to any licensed real estate broker when making such a loan. A licensed real estate broker may make a loan secured by a lien on real property for sale to a finance lender or arrange for a loan secured by a lien on real property to be made by a finance lender without obtaining a license under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22058.

This division does not apply to any cemetery broker licensed under the Cemetery Act (Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 9600) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22059.

A license to act as a broker under this division does not authorize the licensee to negotiate or perform any act as a broker in connection with loans made or to be made by a lender not licensed as a finance lender under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22060.

This division does not apply to a loan made or arranged by a licensed residential mortgage lender or servicer when acting under the authority of that license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 564, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

22061.

(a) This division does not apply to any nonprofit church extension fund.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Nonprofit church extension fund” means a nonprofit organization affiliated with a church, that is formed for the purpose of making loans to that church’s congregational organization or organizations for site acquisitions, new facilities, or improvements to existing facilities, purchased for the benefit
 of the church congregational organization.

(2) What constitutes a “church” shall be determined from the following criteria, none of which has controlling weight: a distinct legal existence; a recognized creed and form of worship; a definite and distinct ecclesiastical government; a formal code of doctrine and discipline; a distinct religious history; a membership not associated with any other religion or denomination; a complete organization of ordained ministers ministering to their congregations; ordained ministers selected after completing prescribed courses of study; a literature of its own; established places of worship; regular congregations; regular religious services; schools for the religious instruction of youth; and schools for the preparation of its ministers.

(3) “Church congregational organization” means a group of individuals who gather for the purpose of practicing
 the religion or manner of worship promulgated by the church with which the organization is affiliated.

(4) “Site acquisitions” means purchases of land intended for use by a church congregational organization.

(5) “New facilities” means purchases of buildings or structures intended for use by a church congregational organization.

(6) “Improvements” means purchases of materials intended to increase the quality of existing religious sites or facilities.

(c) For purposes of this section, a nonprofit church extension fund shall establish that it is exempt from federal taxation pursuant to Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, no individual may be
 held responsible for the repayment of any loan made by a nonprofit church extension fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22062.

(a) This division does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A commercial bridge loan made by a venture capital company to an operating company.

(2) A venture capital investment made by a venture capital company in an equity security issued by an operating company.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Venture capital company” means a person other than an individual or sole proprietorship that meets all of the following:

(A) Engages primarily in the business of promoting economic, business, or industrial development through venture capital investments or the provision of financial or management assistance to operating companies.

(B) At all times maintains at least 50 percent of its assets in venture capital investments or commitments to make venture capital investments, and maintains or, assuming consummation of the equity investment to which the commercial bridge loan relates, will maintain a material equity interest in the operating company.

(C) Approves each loan made to an operating company through the venture capital company’s board of directors, executive committee, or similar policy body, based on a reasonable belief that the loan is appropriate for the operating company after reasonable inquiry concerning the operating company’s financing objectives and financial situation.

(D) Complies, when making the loan, with all applicable federal and state laws and rules or orders governing securities transactions including, but not limited to, the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Investment Company Act of 1940, and the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.

(2) “Operating company” means a person that meets all of the following:

(A) Primarily engages, wholly or substantially, directly or indirectly through a majority
 owned subsidiary or subsidiaries, in the production or sale, or the research or development, of a product or service other than the management or investment of capital. This shall not include any of the following:

(i) A person that is either an individual or a sole proprietorship.

(ii) A person that has no specific business plan or purpose or has indicated that its business plan is to engage in a merger or acquisition with an unidentified company or companies or other entity or person.

(B) Uses all of the proceeds of the commercial bridge loan for the operations of its business.

(C) Approves each commercial bridge loan through its board of directors, executive committee, or similar policy board, in the exercise of its fiduciary duty, based on a
 reasonable belief that the loan is appropriate for the operating company after reasonable inquiry concerning the operating company’s financing objectives and financial situation.

(3) “Commercial bridge loan” means a loan that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) A loan of a principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, or any loan under an open-end credit program, whether secured by personal property or unsecured, the proceeds of which are intended by the operating company for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(B) Is made with a maturity date not to exceed three years,
 and in connection with or in bona fide contemplation of, an equity investment in the operating company.

(C) Is secured, if at all, solely by the operating company’s business assets, exclusive of any real property.

(D) Is subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing under Section 1655 of the Civil Code.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (1), “venture capital investment” is an acquisition of securities in an operating company that a person, an investment adviser of the person, or an affiliated person of either, has or obtains management rights to.

(5) “Equity security” shall have the same meaning as in Section 3(a)(11) of the federal Securities
 Exchange Act of 1934.

(c) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), for the purposes of determining whether a loan is a commercial bridge loan, a venture capital company may rely on any written statement of intended purposes signed by the operating company. The statement may be a separate statement signed by the operating company or may be contained in another document signed by the operating company, but in each case it shall be approved by its board of directors, executive committee, or similar policy body. The venture capital company may not be required to ascertain that the proceeds of the loan are used in accordance with the statement of intended purposes.

(d) For purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the principles set forth in Section 22551 shall be used to determine whether the specified amount of a commercial
 bridge loan is a bona fide principal amount.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate or diminish the application of any other laws that are designed to protect borrowers, including, but not limited to, laws pertaining to licensing, unfair competition, usury, and conflicts of
 interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22063.

(a) This division does not apply to a franchise loan made by a franchisor to a franchisee or a subfranchisor or by a subfranchisor to a franchisee.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Franchise” means “franchise,” as defined in Section 31005 of the Corporations Code.

(2) “Franchisee” means “franchisee,” as defined in Section 31006 of the
 Corporations Code.

(3) “Franchisor” means “franchisor,” as defined in Section 31007 of the Corporations Code.

(4) “Area franchise” means “area franchise,” as defined in Section 31008 of the Corporations Code.

(5) “Subfranchise” means “subfranchise,” as defined in Section 31008.5 of the Corporations Code.

(6) “Subfranchisor” means “subfranchisor,” as defined in Section 31009 of the Corporations Code.

(7) “Franchised business” means a business operated pursuant to a franchise or area franchise by a franchisee or pursuant to a franchise, area franchise or subfranchise by a subfranchisor.

(8) “Franchise loan” means a commercial
 loan, as defined in Section 22502, made by a franchisor to a current or prospective franchisee or subfranchisor or a commercial loan by a subfranchisor to a current or prospective franchisee for the acquisition, construction, operation, development, equipping, expansion, contraction, consolidation, merger, recapitalization, reorganization, or termination of a franchised business provided that the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The franchisor or subfranchisor making the franchise loan shall comply with all applicable federal and state franchise disclosure and registration laws, regulations, rules and orders, including, but not limited to, the California Franchise Investment Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 31000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code) and the Federal Trade Commission Franchise Rule: Disclosure Requirements and Prohibitions Concerning Franchising and Business Opportunity Ventures (Code of Federal Regulations, Title
 16, Chapter 1, Subchapter D, Part 436 (16 CFR 436), as amended) in connection with the offer or sale of any franchise, area franchise, or subfranchise to which the franchise loan relates.

(B) The proceeds of the franchise loan are intended by the borrowing franchisee or subfranchisor for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(C) The loan, if secured, is secured solely by the assets of the franchised business to which the franchise loan relates. Property used by the borrower primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, including the borrower’s personal residence, shall not be taken as security for the loan.

(D) The loan is subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing under Section 1655 of the Civil Code.

(E) The lender shall fully and clearly disclose to the borrower, at or before the time the loan is made, the rates of interest, charges, and costs of the loan.

(c) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (b), a lending franchisor or subfranchisor may rely on any written statement of intended purposes by the borrowing franchisee or subfranchisor. The statement may be a separate statement signed by the borrowing franchisee or subfranchisor or may be contained in another document signed by the borrowing franchisee or subfranchisor. The lending franchisor or subfranchisor may not be required to ascertain that the proceeds of a franchise loan are used in accordance with the statement of intended purposes.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate or diminish the application of any other laws that are designed to protect borrowers,
 including, but not limited to, laws pertaining to licensing, unfair competition, usury and conflicts of interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 16.   Effective September 10, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22064.

(a) This division does not apply to the following:

(1) A program-related investment defined in subsection (c) of Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code and United States Treasury Regulations Section 53.4944-3 that is made by a private foundation, tax-exempt organization within the meaning of Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue
 Code.

(2) A loan, guaranty, or investment made by a public charity, tax-exempt organization within the meaning of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The primary purpose of the loan, guaranty, or investment is to accomplish one or more of the exempt purposes of the public charity making the loan, as described in Section 170(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Neither the production of income nor the appreciation of property is a significant purpose of the loan, guaranty, or investment.

(C) No purpose of the loan, guaranty, or investment is to accomplish one or more of the purposes described in Section 170(c)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue
 Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not exempt from the provisions of this division a tax-exempt organization that is making consumer loans as defined in Sections 22203 and 22204.

(c) A loan that is secured by any assets owned by an individual shall be exempt under subdivision (a) only if the individual providing the security is an “accredited investor” as defined in paragraph (5) or (6) of subsection (a) of Section 230.501 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Property held by an individual for personal, family, or household purposes, including an individual’s personal residence, may not be taken as security for a loan.

(d) A program-related investment by a private foundation, and any loan, guaranty, or investment made by a public charity that is exempt under subdivision (a) is subject to the implied covenant
 of good faith and fair dealing under Section 1655 of the Civil Code.

(e) (1) Subdivision (a) shall exempt from the provisions of this division a program-related investment by a private foundation, or a loan, guaranty, or investment by a public charity, only if the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The organization making the program-related investment, loan, guaranty, or investment is exempt from federal income taxes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is organized and operated exclusively for one or more of the purposes described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) No part of the net earnings of the organization making the program-related investment, loan, guaranty or investment inures to the benefit of a private shareholder or individual.

(C) No broker’s fee will be paid in connection with the making of the program-related investment, loan, guaranty, or investment or placement of the program-related investment, loan, guaranty or investment.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit the organization making the program-related investment, loan, guaranty, or investment from charging interest on the loan or investment or fees on the guaranty.

(f) Subdivision (a) shall only exempt from the provisions of this division a program-related investment by a private foundation or a loan, guaranty, or investment by a public charity that is made for the primary purpose of accomplishing one or more of the organization’s exempt purposes described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and no significant purpose of which is the production of income or the
 appreciation of property within the meaning of subsection (c) of Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code. A recipient shall be required to use all funds received from the private foundation or the public charity only for the charitable purposes for which the program-related investment, loan, guaranty, or investment was made.

(g) Subdivision (a) shall only exempt from the provisions of this division a program-related investment by a private foundation or a loan, guaranty, or investment by a public charity if the organization consummates not more than 35 loans in a calendar year. In the making and negotiating of these loans, the private foundation or public charity shall take into consideration the financial ability of the recipients to repay the loans in the time and manner provided.

(h) Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate or diminish the application of any other
 applicable laws that are designed to govern the tax-exempt organizations described in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, laws pertaining to recordkeeping and reporting to the Attorney General and the Internal Revenue Service or to protect borrowers, including, but not limited to, laws pertaining to licenses, unfair competition, usury, and conflicts of interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22065.

(a) Persons not subject to this division may apply to the commissioner for an exempt company registration for the purpose of sponsoring one or more individuals required to be licensed as mortgage loan originators pursuant to the federal SAFE Act.

(b) An exempt person applying under the exempt company registration procedure shall comply with all rules and orders that the commissioner deems necessary to ensure compliance with the federal SAFE Act and shall pay an annual registration fee established by the commissioner.

(c) (1) A mortgage loan originator who is an insurance producer eligible for licensure pursuant to this section shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Be covered under an exclusive written contract with, and originate mortgage loans solely on behalf of, that exempt person.

(B) Hold a current insurance producer license under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code that is not suspended or revoked.

(C) Have a current notice of appointment under Article 9 (commencing with Section 1702) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code from an insurer that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with that exempt person.

(2) A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an insurance producer for an insurer authorized to do business in this state may originate loans on behalf of a person registered pursuant to subdivision (a) or on behalf of a licensed finance lender that originates loans exclusively for a single person that is not subject to licensure pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22050.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 3.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22066.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that nonprofit organizations have an important role to play in helping individuals obtain access to affordable, credit-building small dollar loans. California law should refrain from creating statutory barriers that risk slowing the growth of these loans. This section shall be liberally construed to encourage nonprofit organizations to help facilitate the making of zero-interest, low-cost loans, through lending circles and other programs and services that allow individuals to establish and build credit histories or to improve their credit scores.

(b) For the purposes of this section, an organization described in subdivision (c) shall be known as an exempt organization, and an
 organization described in subdivision (d) shall be known as a partnering organization.

(c) There shall be exempted from this division a nonprofit organization that facilitates one or more zero-interest, low-cost loans, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The organization is exempt from federal income taxes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is organized and operated exclusively for one or more of the purposes described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
